Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 7. LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITIES

SUBTITLE A. LIFE INSURANCE IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 1108. BENEFITS EXEMPT FROM SEIZURE

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1108.001. CONSTRUCTION WITH OTHER LAW. The exemptions under this chapter are in addition to the exemptions from garnishment, attachment, execution, or other seizure under Chapter 42, Property Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 2, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1108.002. ANNUITY CONTRACTS. For purposes of regulation under this code, an annuity contract is considered an insurance policy or contract if the annuity contract is issued:

(1) by a life, health, or accident insurance company, including a mutual company or fraternal benefit society; or

(2) under an annuity or benefit plan used by an employer or individual.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 2, eff. June 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER B. EXEMPTIONS FROM SEIZURE

Sec. 1108.051. EXEMPTIONS FOR CERTAIN INSURANCE AND ANNUITY BENEFITS. (a) Except as provided by Section 1108.053, this section applies to any benefits, including the cash value and proceeds of an insurance policy, to be provided to an insured or beneficiary under:

(1) an insurance policy or annuity contract issued by a life, health, or accident insurance company, including a mutual company or fraternal benefit society; or

(2) an annuity or benefit plan used by an employer or individual.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, insurance or annuity benefits described by Subsection (a):

(1) inure exclusively to the benefit of the person for whose use and benefit the insurance or annuity is designated in the policy or contract; and

(2) are fully exempt from:

(A) garnishment, attachment, execution, or other seizure;

(B) seizure, appropriation, or application by any legal or equitable process or by operation of law to pay a debt or other liability of an insured or of a beneficiary, either before or after the benefits are provided; and

(C) a demand in a bankruptcy proceeding of the insured or beneficiary.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 2, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1108.052. EXEMPTIONS UNAFFECTED BY BENEFICIARY DESIGNATION. The exemptions provided by Section 1108.051 apply regardless of whether:

(1) the power to change the beneficiary is reserved to the insured; or

(2) the insured or the insured's estate is a beneficiary.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 2, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 649), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 1108.053. EXCEPTIONS TO EXEMPTIONS. The exemptions provided by Section 1108.051 do not apply to:

(1) a premium payment made in fraud of a creditor, subject to the applicable statute of limitations for recovering the payment;

(2) a debt of the insured or beneficiary secured by a pledge of the insurance policy or the proceeds of the policy; or

(3) a child support lien or levy under Chapter 157, Family Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 2, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 10A.301(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER C. ASSIGNMENT OF BENEFITS

Sec. 1108.101. ASSIGNMENT GENERALLY. (a) This chapter does not prevent an insured, owner, or annuitant from assigning, in accordance with the terms of the policy or contract:

(1) any benefits to be provided under an insurance policy or annuity contract to which this chapter applies; or

(2) any other rights under the policy or contract.

(b) A benefit or right described by Subsection (a) assigned by an insured, owner, or annuitant after a child support lien notice has been filed against the insured, owner, or annuitant by the Title IV-D agency continues to be subject to the child support lien after the date of assignment. The lien continues to secure payment of all child support arrearages owed by the insured, owner, or annuitant under the underlying child support order, including arrearages that accrue after the date of assignment.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 2, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 508 (H.B. 1674), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1108.102. CERTAIN ASSIGNMENTS VOID. If an insurance policy, annuity contract, or annuity or benefit plan described by Section 1108.051 prohibits a beneficiary from assigning or commuting benefits to be provided or other rights under the policy, contract, or plan, an assignment or commutation or attempted assignment or commutation of the benefits or rights by the beneficiary is void.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 2, eff. June 1, 2003.